West Virginia, session 2025, HB2968.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. WEST VIRGINIA PUBLIC EMPLOYEES INSURANCE ACT. §5-16-33. Cessation of PEIA as public healthcare entity; allowing for the privatization and continuation of PEIA; money paid directly to employee; effective date. (a) PEIA shall cease to operate as a public healthcare entity in this state after the effective date of this section.(b) PEIA may continue to operate in this state as a private healthcare entity.(c) All monies that are currently distributed to PEIA from the employer shall be paid directly to the employee in the form of a match in a Health Savings Account ("HSA") for the employee to use for the payment of healthcare insurance premiums or other related healthcare expenditures. (d) The monthly payment to the employee shall be in the amount of $1,100, to be paid directly to the HSA, as otherwise set forth in §5-16-27 of this code.(e) An employee may choose his or her own healthcare provider to use funds from the HSA, or the employee may continue to pay into PEIA as a private provider if he or she chooses.(f) This section shall become effective July 1, 2025.